Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.95.125

Washington college savings program account deposits—Effect of bankruptcy filings and enforcement of judgments.

With regard to bankruptcy filings and enforcement of judgments under Title 6 RCW, participant Washington college savings program account deposits made more than two years before the date of filing or judgment are considered excluded personal assets.

[ 2016 c 69 s 16.]